Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.070

Renewal of license.

Every licensed physical therapist and physical therapist assistant shall apply to the secretary for a renewal of the license and pay to the state treasurer a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 2007 c 98 s 8; 1996 c 191 s 61; 1991 c 3 s 180; 1983 c 116 s 12; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 67; 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 13; 1961 c 64 s 6; 1949 c 239 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10163-7.]